District of Columbia statutes.
21-2004

Effect of a finding of incapacity.

A finding under this chapter that an individual is incapacitated shall not constitute a finding of legal incompetence. An individual found to be incapacitated shall retain all legal rights and abilities other than those expressly limited or curtailed in the order of appointment of a guardian or in a protective proceeding, or subsequent order of the court.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632

History

1981 Ed., § 21-2004.

Prior Codifications